Connecticut, session 2026, HB05487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) The Department of
Education shall establish an American Sign Language education
working group which shall consist of (1) a representative from each of
the following: The Departments of Education and Aging and Disability
Services, the Labor Department, the Office of Higher Education, the
Connecticut Council of Language Teachers, the American School for the
Deaf and the Connecticut Association of the Deaf, and (2) at least one
American Sign Language instructor who teaches in a public school in
the state.
(b) The working group shall provide recommendations to the
Department of Education regarding the following:
(1) Curriculum guidance for American Sign Language instruction
that includes, but is not limited to, aligning such curriculum with
nationally recognized proficiency frameworks;
(2) Teacher certification standards based on standards established by
the American Sign Language Teachers Association and the American
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5487
Sign Language Proficiency Interview that includes, but is not limited to,
(A) establishment of a proficiency benchmark, (B) recognition of an
alternative certification pathway for native American Sign Language
users and interpreters, and (C) reciprocity with American Sign
Language teaching certifications from other states; and
(3) Guidance to educator preparation programs in the state
concerning, but not limited to, the (A) expansion of American Sign
Language and interpretation education programs, (B) creation of
educational incentives, such as tuition support, credit enhancement or
alternative programs, and (C) establishment of bridge, endorsement or
alternative programs for native American Sign Language users and
certified interpreters seeking teacher certification.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit a progress report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to education and human services concerning the work
of the American Sign Language education working group.
Sec. 2. Subsection (d) of section 17a-812 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services may expend
up to [ten] fourteen thousand dollars per fiscal year per person twenty-
one years of age or older who is both blind or visually impaired and
deaf, in addition to any other expenditures for such person, for the
purpose of providing community inclusion services through specialized
public and private entities from which such person can benefit. The
commissioner may determine the criteria by which a person is eligible
to receive specialized services and may adopt regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "community inclusion services" means the assistance
provided to persons with disabilities to enable them to connect with
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5487
their peers without disabilities and with the community at large.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 17a-812(d)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed; and in Section 1(b)(3)(B), "alternative route
programs" was changed to "alternative programs" for consistency.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3